Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-221
Incorporation.

(MBCA 2.03) (a) Unless a delayed effective
date is specified, the corporate existence begins when the articles of incorporation
are filed.

(b) The Secretary of State's
filing of the articles of incorporation is conclusive proof that the incorporators
satisfied all conditions precedent to incorporation except in a proceeding
by the state to cancel or revoke the incorporation or involuntarily dissolve
the corporation.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 21.